Tennessee, session 114, SB0213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-17-120, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( )
(1) Notwithstanding this part, a motor vehicle dealer license is not
required to sell or purchase previously titled antique or unique motor vehicles
through an auction format held in conjunction with a motor vehicle festival:
(A) Held at a municipal convention center, as defined in § 7-4-
101, located in a county with a population of not less than three hundred
sixty-six thousand two hundred (366,200) and not more than three
hundred sixty-six thousand three hundred (366,300), according to the
2020 federal census or any subsequent census; and
(B) For which a portion of the festival's proceeds are donated to a
hospital neurological institute located in a county with a population of not
less than three hundred sixty-six thousand two hundred (366,200) and not
more than three hundred sixty-six thousand three hundred (366,300),
according to the 2020 federal census or any subsequent census.
(2) This subsection ( ) is repealed on October 22, 2025.
SB0213
001281
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-19-128, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
( )
(1) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(9), a motor vehicle dealer license is
not required to sell or purchase previously titled antique or unique motor vehicles
through an auction format held in conjunction with a motor vehicle festival:
(A) Held at a municipal convention center, as defined in § 7-4-
101, located in a county with a population of not less than three hundred
sixty-six thousand two hundred (366,200) and not more than three
hundred sixty-six thousand three hundred (366,300), according to the
2020 federal census or any subsequent census; and
(B) For which a portion of the festival's proceeds are donated to a
hospital neurological institute located in a county with a population of not
less than three hundred sixty-six thousand two hundred (366,200) and not
more than three hundred sixty-six thousand three hundred (366,300),
according to the 2020 federal census or any subsequent census.
(2) This subsection ( ) is repealed on October 22, 2025.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect October 17, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001281